Illinois, session 104th, SB2440.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Funeral or Burial Funds Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1, 1a, and 10 and by adding 6Section 2c as follows: 7    (225 ILCS 45/1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73.101)8    Sec. 1. Payment under pre-need contract. Except as 9otherwise provided in this Section, all sales proceeds paid to 10any person, partnership, association or corporation with 11respect to merchandise or services covered by this Act, upon 12any agreement or contract, or any series or combination of 13agreements or contracts, which has for a purpose the 14furnishing or performance of funeral services, or the 15furnishing or delivery of any personal property, merchandise, 16or services of any nature in connection with the final 17disposition of a dead human body, including, but not limited 18to, outer burial containers, urns, combination casket-vault 19units, caskets and clothing, for future delivery use at a time 20determinable by the death of the person or persons whose body 21or bodies are to be so disposed of, shall be held to be trust 22funds, and shall be placed in trust in accordance with 23Sections 1b and 2, or shall be used to purchase life insurance   SB2440- 2 -LRB104 11866 JDS 21956 b1or annuities in accordance with Section 2a. The person, 2partnership, association or corporation receiving said 3payments under a pre-need contract is hereby declared to be a 4trustee thereof until deposits of funds are made in accordance 5with Section 1b or 2a of this Act.6    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to prohibit the 7inclusion of outer burial containers in sales contracts under 8the Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-879, eff. 2-2-10.) 10    (225 ILCS 45/1a)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73.101a)11    Sec. 1a. For the purposes of this Act, the following terms 12shall have the meanings specified, unless the context clearly 13requires another meaning:14    "Beneficiary" means the person specified in the pre-need 15contract upon whose death funeral services or merchandise 16shall be provided or delivered.17    "Licensee" means a seller of a pre-need contract who has 18been licensed by the Comptroller under this Act.19    "Outer burial container" means any container made of 20concrete, steel, wood, fiberglass or similar material, used 21solely at the interment site, and designed and used 22exclusively to surround or enclose a separate casket and to 23support the earth above such casket, commonly known as a 24burial vault, grave box or grave liner, but not including a 25lawn crypt as defined in the Illinois Pre-need Cemetery Sales   SB2440- 3 -LRB104 11866 JDS 21956 b1Act.2    "Parent company" means a corporation owning more than 12 3cemeteries or funeral homes in more than one state.4    "Person" means any person, partnership, association, 5corporation, or other entity.6    "Pre-need contract" means any agreement or contract, or 7any series or combination of agreements or contracts, whether 8funded by trust deposits or life insurance policies or 9annuities, which has for a purpose the furnishing or 10performance of funeral services or the furnishing or delivery 11of any personal property, merchandise, or services of any 12nature in connection with the final disposition of a dead 13human body. Nothing in this Act is intended to regulate the 14content of a life insurance policy or a tax-deferred annuity.15    "Provider" means a person who is obligated for furnishing 16or performing funeral services or the furnishing or delivery 17of any personal property, merchandise, or services of any 18nature in connection with the final disposition of a dead 19human body.20    "Purchaser" means the person who originally paid the money 21under or in connection with a pre-need contract.22    "Sales proceeds" means the entire amount paid to a seller, 23exclusive of sales taxes paid by the seller, finance charges 24paid by the purchaser, and credit life, accident or disability 25insurance premiums, upon any agreement or contract, or series 26or combination of agreements or contracts, for the purpose of   SB2440- 4 -LRB104 11866 JDS 21956 b1performing funeral services or furnishing personal property, 2merchandise, or services of any nature in connection with the 3final disposition of a dead human body, including, but not 4limited to, the retail price paid for such services and 5personal property and merchandise.6    "Purchase price" means sales proceeds less finance charges 7on retail installment contracts.8    "Seller" means the person who sells or offers to sell the 9pre-need contract to a purchaser, whether funded by a trust 10agreement, life insurance policy, or tax-deferred annuity.11    "Transportation protection agreement" means an agreement 12that primarily provides or arranges for services related to 13the preparation for the purpose of transportation and 14subsequent transportation of human remains or cremated 15remains. 16    "Trustee" means a person authorized to hold funds under 17this Act.18(Source: P.A. 92-419, eff. 1-1-02.) 19    (225 ILCS 45/2c new)20    Sec. 2c. Transportation protection agreements. The 21Illinois Insurance Code does not apply to any transportation 22protection agreement sold by any seller. 23    (225 ILCS 45/10)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 73.110)24    Sec. 10. Nothing in this Act shall be deemed to apply to   SB2440- 5 -LRB104 11866 JDS 21956 b1(1) merchandise that is delivered within 30 days of purchase, 2(2) a transportation protection agreement, or (3) pre-need 3cemetery sales under the "Illinois Pre-Need Cemetery Sales 4Act", enacted by the 84th General Assembly.5(Source: P.A. 85-293.)